Utah statutes.
77-6-8.   Judgment of removal -- Service on defendant.
If the defendant admits the accusation or is convicted, the court shall enter
judgment against him directing the defendant be removed from office and
setting forth the causes of removal. The judgment of removal shall immediately
be served upon the defendant.
